Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article XI Initiative, Referendum, and Recall

Section 1. Initiative and Referendum.

The people may propose and enact laws by the initiative, and approve or reject acts of the legislature by the referendum.

Cross references. —

For restrictions on initiatives, see Alaska Const., art. XI, § 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The word “acts,” as used in the referendum provisions of this article, refers to an entire act of the legislature and not to sections of acts.
1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The referendum is a veto power analogous to the veto power vested in the governor by Alaska Const., art. II, § 15. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The referendum and the veto power serve similar functions in legislative process; hence, the limitations of one apply to the other except as distinctions are specified in the constitution. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The purpose of the veto is to prevent the adoption of the undesirable legislation; the veto power is not a power to change the effect of proposed laws or to do anything concerning them except to approve or disapprove them as a whole. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

The veto power may be exercised only against entire bills, and it may not be exercised upon sections of bills except in the case of appropriation bills. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

Were the referendum interpreted as extending to sections of act, its avowed purpose to approve or disapprove acts would be frustrated. It would in many cases result in exactly that which it is not intended to do. It would change the effect of a proposed law, and frustrate the legislative purpose. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 18.

An initiative may be used to repeal a law since to read this section so as to sever the power to repeal from the initiative, thus eliminating popular votes on previous initiatives, on statutes not subject to referendum, i.e., those for which the time limit has passed, and on parts of statutes as opposed to an entire enactment, is illogical given the very intent, subject to express exceptions, to vest the voting public with legislative power equal to the legislature’s power. April 14, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

In the context of this article, the referendum has a restricted scope of operation: First, a referendum may only reject “acts of the legislature” and not acts by initiative; second, a referendum may address only acts passed by an immediately preceding legislative session; and third, a referendum may reject only entire acts of the legislature and not sections thereof. Thus, unless a law sought to be rejected falls within the ambit of the “acts” described, a referendum is unavailable. April 14, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 2. Application.

An initiative or referendum is proposed by an application containing the bill to be initiated or the act to be referred. The application shall be signed by not less than one hundred qualified voters as sponsors, and shall be filed with the lieutenant governor. If he finds it in proper form he shall so certify. Denial of certification shall be subject to judicial review.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the second sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The word “form” is the antithesis of the word “substance.” Substance is that which is essential in content and goes to the merits of the issue. Substance pertains to matters which affect the basic rights of parties. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 35.

The lieutenant governor acts in a ministerial capacity. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 35.

The lieutenant governor can make such inquiry and investigation as to the voting qualifications of individual signers of an initiative application as appears reasonably necessary in his discretion, but he may look only at form and not the substance of an application. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 35. But see Boucher v. Engstrom, 528 P.2d 456 (Alaska 1974), overruled, McAlpine v. University of Alaska, 762 P.2d 81 (Alaska 1988).

The requirement that the lieutenant governor certify as to the form of the application under this section would be meaningless if the general provisions of Alaska Const., art. II, § 13 did not apply. There would be nothing to certify to since the article on initiative sets out no particular form of an initiative. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 36.

The intent of this section is obviously to insure that the proposed initiative or referendum has some substantial support before the state is subjected to the expense involved in printing of formal petitions regarding the measure. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

This article is rather unique in that it provides for two separate stages in the preparing of an initiative or referendum for submission to the electorate. Before circulating a petition, the proponents of an initiative or referendum must first circulate an application “containing the bill to be initiated or the act to be referred” and obtain the signatures of not less than one hundred qualified voters as sponsors of the application. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

The state legislature has interpreted and implemented this section by passing a statute (AS

15.45.270

) requiring the application for a referendum petition to include the act to be referred. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

The constitution does not permit a summary of an act to be substituted for a copy of the act in the application. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

The application for referendum petition submitted was not in proper form and it was necessary for the proponents of the measure to prepare an application containing the text of ch. 52, SLA 1963, and secure the necessary number of signatures to this application before they could validly prepare a petition for circulation under Alaska Const., art. XI, § 3. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

Where ch. 52, SLA 1963, contained seven sections affecting many different sections of the Alaska Statutes, it was not adequately described by the words “legislation enacted by the last legislative assembly pertaining to the formation of mandatory boroughs in the State of Alaska.” 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

Section 3. Petition.

After certification of the application, a petition containing a summary of the subject matter shall be prepared by the lieutenant governor for circulation by the sponsors.
If signed by qualified voters who are equal in number to at least ten percent of those who voted in the preceding general election, who are
resident in at least three-fourths of the house districts of the State, and who, in each of those house districts, are equal in number to at least seven percent of those who voted in the preceding general election in the house district, it may be filed with the lieutenant governor.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the first and second sentences.

The amendment effective January 3, 1999 (20th Legislature’s SCS CSHJR 44(JUD)), substituted “house districts” for “election districts” in the last sentence.

The amendment effective January 2, 2005 (23rd Legislature’s HJR 5), rewrote the second sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition which, on its face, is seen to contain an insufficient number of signatures may not be filed and later supplemented to cure the deficiency. February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

An initiative petition must be sufficient on its face before it may be accepted for filing, i.e., it must have the requisite number of purportedly valid signatures before it may be filed in the office of the attorney general; a petition deficient in this respect should be returned to the sponsors. February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Former AS

15.45.170

authorizes a supplementary petition, but that privilege is afforded only when a petition, believed to contain a sufficient number of signatures of qualified voters, is later found to contain signatures of persons who are not qualified voters; in such a case, the latent defect of numbers may be cured, but where the defect is patent, the petition may not be accepted for filing. February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 4. Initiative Election.

An initiative petition may be filed at any time. The lieutenant governor shall prepare a ballot title and proposition summarizing the proposed law, and shall place them on the ballot for the first statewide election held more than one hundred twenty days after adjournment of the legislative session following the filing. If, before the election, substantially the same measure has been enacted, the petition is void.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the second sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition must be filed before the start of the legislative session in order to be presented to the electorate at the first state-wide election held 120 or more days after the conclusion of that session. February 1, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 5. Referendum Election.

A referendum petition may be filed only within ninety days after adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed. The lieutenant governor shall prepare a ballot title and proposition summarizing the act and shall place them on the ballot for the first statewide election held more than one hundred eighty days after adjournment of that session.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2(1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” near the beginning of the second sentence.

Section 6. Enactment.

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition favor its adoption, the initiated measure is enacted. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition favor the rejection of an act referred, it is rejected. The lieutenant governor shall certify the election returns. An initiated law becomes effective ninety days after certification, is not subject to veto, and may not be repealed by the legislature within two years of its effective date. It may be amended at any time. An act rejected by referendum is void thirty days after certification. Additional procedures for the initiative and referendum may be prescribed by law.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2(1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” near the beginning of the third sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The constitutional specification as to effective date is plain on its face. An initiative becomes effective 90 days after the date on which the lieutenant governor certifies the election returns approving it. August 19, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Only repeal is prohibited by the state constitution, not amendments. August 19, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

The legislature could amend the capital move initiative, initiative No. 1, at any time to alter or delete: (1) the requirement that the capital site contain no less than 100 square miles of state land or lands available to the state at no cost and (2) the requirement that the site selected by more than 30 miles from Anchorage or Fairbanks. August 19, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 7. Restrictions.

The initiative shall not be used to dedicate revenues, make or repeal appropriations, create courts, define the jurisdiction of courts or prescribe their rules, or enact local or special legislation. The referendum shall not be applied to dedications of revenue, to appropriations, to local or special legislation, or to laws necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

Cross references. —

For restrictions on the form of bills, see art. II, § 13 of this constitution.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendment proposed by 2000 Legislative Resolve 48 (HJR 56) (prohibition on wildlife initiatives) was rejected by voters.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Authorizing school service areas to submit their budgets to the people by referendum would violate this section. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

Section 8. Recall.

All elected public officials in the State, except judicial officers, are subject to recall by the voters of the State or political subdivision from which elected. Procedures and grounds for recall shall be prescribed by the legislature.